yeoman-custom/cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/nci_rules
// translation rules for Classical Nahuatl
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.L01 e ē i ī    // letter group for front vowels


.group a
	a	a

.group ā
	ā	a:

.group c
	c	k
	c (L01	s
	ch	tS
	cu	kw

.group e
	e	e

.group ē
	ē	e:
	ē (_	'e:    // vocative, stress in final vowel

.group h
	h	?
	hu	w

.group i
	i	i

.group ī
	ī	i:

.group l
	l	l

.group m
	m	m


.group n
	n	n

.group o
	o	o

.group ō
	ō	o:

.group p
	p	p

.group q
	qu	k

.group t
	t	t

.group u
	u	o
	u (A	w
	uc	wk
	uq	k
	uh	w


.group x
	x	S

.group y
	y	j

.group z
	z	s

.group
	b	b
	d	d
	f	f
	g	g
	j	x
	k	k
	r	R
	s	s
	v	v
	w	w
	ç	s
	#	_:
